District of Columbia statutes.
4-517.01

Crime victims assistance.

(a)

The victims assistance grants agency shall have the authority to use the funds transferred pursuant to § 4-515 to award grants and contracts to private nonprofit organizations and to transfer funds to government entities which provide assistance to crime victims.

(b)

Repealed.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-243, § 18a
as added Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 202(e), 47 DCR 6308
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 1192(f), 51 DCR 8441

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-205 repealed subsec. (b).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 202(e) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1192(f) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1192(f) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).